Montana, session 2025, HB842.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Sales tax to reduce education property taxes -- exemptions. (1) The
legislature may enact a sales tax not to exceed 4% to reduce property taxes that fund public schools and the
Montana university system.
(2) If enacted, a sales tax should minimize repeated taxation by taxing final goods and services
and exempt the following:
(a) housing and utilities;
(b) groceries;
(c) fuel used for transportation and agriculture;
(d) health care; and
(e) financial and insurance services.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 15, and the provisions of Title 15 apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on approval by the electorate.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Submission to electorate. [This act] shall be submitted to the qualified
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 842

2026
69th Legislature 2025 HB 842.1
electors of Montana at the general election to be held in November 2026 by printing on the ballot the full title of
[this act] and the following:
☐ YES on Legislative Referendum ____.
☐ NO on Legislative Referendum ____.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 842